Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202646-2,125
Order granting application and map; contents; appeal.

After an investigation and hearing, if applicable, the Chief Water Officer shall issue an order granting or denying the application for transfer and map under section 46-2,122. The Chief Water Officer shall deny the application if the conditions in subsection (2) of such section are not met. An order granting or denying an application for transfer and map shall be in writing and shall specify the following:

(1) The tracts of land retaining an appropriation;

(2) The tracts of land receiving an appropriation; and

(3) The tracts of land transferring an appropriation.

An appeal may be taken from the decision of the Chief Water Officer on the application for transfer and map as provided in section 61-207.

Laws 1995, LB 99, § 6;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 157;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 141.